Massachusetts, session 194th, H625.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “committee”, in line 1, the
following words:- or a private educational institution providing a course of study through the
twelfth grade.
SECTION 2. Said section 37G of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the words “of the school committee”, in line 2, and inserting in place
thereof the following word:- thereof.
SECTION 3. Said section 37G of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “committee”, in line 6, the following words:- or a private
educational institution providing a course of study through the twelfth grade.
of 2

SECTION 4. Said section 37G of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the words “of the school committee”, in lines 6 and 7, and inserting in
place thereof the following word:- thereof.
SECTION 5. Subsection (b) of said section 37G of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- When such an assault has occurred in a
private educational institution, the institution shall file a detailed report with the board of
education.
of 2